Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.170

Violations.

It is unlawful for any person in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of any franchise or subfranchise in this state directly or indirectly:

(1) To make any untrue statement of a material fact in any application, notice, or report filed with the director under this law or willfully to omit to state in any application, notice or report, any material fact which is required to be stated therein or fails to notify the director of any material change as required by RCW 19.100.070(3).

(2) To sell or offer to sell by means of any written or oral communication which includes an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made in light of the circumstances under which they were made not misleading.

(3) To employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud.

(4) To engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person.

(5) To violate any order of the director.

[ 1991 c 226 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 17.]